Hawaii statutes.
[§432E-13] Annual report. The
commissioner shall submit annually to the legislature a report that shall
contain the number of external review hearing cases reviewed, the type of cases
reviewed, a summary of the nature of the cases reviewed, and the disposition of
the cases reviewed. The identities of the plan and the enrollee shall be
protected from disclosure in the report. [L 1999, c 137, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next